Hawaii statutes.
§11-120 Distribution of ballots; record.
The chief election officer or the county clerk in county elections shall
forward the official ballots, specimen ballots, and other materials to the
precinct officials of the various precincts. They shall be delivered and kept
in a secure fashion in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the
chief election officer. In no case shall they arrive later than the opening of
the polls on election day.

A record of the number of ballots sent to each
precinct shall be kept by the chief election officer or the clerk. [L 1970, c
26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(ll)]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next